Massachusetts, session 194th, S892.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 10 of chapter 6D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking subsection (q) and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
“(q) If the commission determines that a health care entity has: (i) willfully neglected to 
file a performance improvement plan with the commission within 45 days as required under 
subsection (d); (ii) failed to file an acceptable performance improvement plan in good faith with 
the commission; (iii) failed to implement the performance improvement plan in good faith; or 
(iv) knowingly failed to provide information required by this section to the commission or that 
knowingly falsifies the same, the commission shall assess a civil penalty to the health care entity 
of $500,000 per day.”.